Illinois, session 104th, SB1392.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 370a as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370a)  (from Ch. 73, par. 982a)7    Sec. 370a. Assignability of Accident and Health Insurance, 8including dental insurance. No provision of the Illinois 9Insurance Code, or any other law, prohibits an insured under 10any policy of dental insurance or accident and health 11insurance or any other person who may be the owner of any 12rights under any such policy from making an assignment of all 13or any part of his rights and privileges under the policy 14including but not limited to the right to designate a 15beneficiary and to have an individual policy issued in 16accordance with its terms. Subject to the terms of the policy 17or any contract relating thereto, an assignment by an insured 18or by any other owner of rights under the policy, made before 19or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1969 is 20valid for the purpose of vesting in the assignee, in 21accordance with any provisions included therein as to the time 22at which it is effective, all rights and privileges so 23assigned. However, such assignment is without prejudice to the   SB1392 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1company on account of any payment it makes or individual 2policy it issues before receipt of notice of the assignment. 3This amendatory Act of 1969 acknowledges, declares and 4codifies the existing right of assignment of interests under 5accident and health insurance policies. If an enrollee or 6insured of an insurer, health maintenance organization, 7managed care plan, health care plan, preferred provider 8organization, dental service plan corporation, dental insurer, 9or third party administrator assigns a claim to a health care 10professional, or health care facility, dental care provider, 11or dental care facility, then payment shall be made directly 12to the health care professional, or health care facility, 13dental care provider, or dental care facility, including any 14interest required under Section 368a, of this Code for failure 15to pay claims within 30 days after receipt by the insurer of 16due proof of loss. Nothing in this Section shall be construed 17to prevent any parties from reconciling duplicate payments.18(Source: P.A. 91-605, eff. 12-14-99; 91-788, eff. 6-9-00.) 19    Section 10. The Dental Service Plan Act is amended by 20adding Section 38.1 as follows: 21    (215 ILCS 110/38.1 new)22    Sec. 38.1. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Every 23dental service plan corporation shall comply with Section 370a 24of the Illinois Insurance Code.   SB1392 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    Section 15. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 2amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)5    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 6    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 7the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 8141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 9152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 10155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 11356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 12356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 13356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 14356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 15356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 16356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 17356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 19356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 20356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 21356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 22364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 23368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 24408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of   SB1392 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 2XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 3Illinois Insurance Code.4    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 5for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 6Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 7are deemed to be "domestic companies":8        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 9    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;10        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 11    State; or12        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 13    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 14    of this State, except a corporation subject to 15    substantially the same requirements in its state of 16    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 17    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.18    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 19acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 20pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,21        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 22    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 23    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 24    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 25    acquisition of control takes effect;26        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of   SB1392 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 2    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 3    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 4    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 5    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 6    other acquisition of control;7        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 8    following information:9            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 10        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 11        Organization sought to be acquired;12            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 13        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 14        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 15        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 16        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 17        forma financial statements reflecting projected 18        combined operation for a period of 2 years;19            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 20        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 21        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 22        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and23            (D) such other information as the Director shall 24        require.25    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 26Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by   SB1392 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 2enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 3maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 4to its health care certificates).5    (e) In considering any management contract or service 6agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 7Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 8specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 9take into account the effect of the management contract or 10service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 11and the financial condition of the health maintenance 12organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 13into account the effect of the management contract or service 14agreement on competition.15    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 16Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 17Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 18defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 19Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 20group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 21additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:22        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 23    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 24    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 25    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 26    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall   SB1392 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    not be less than one year); and2        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 3    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 4    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 5    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 6    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 7    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 8    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 9    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 10    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 11    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 12    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 13    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 14    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 15    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 16    plan years.17    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 18statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 19describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 20and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 21the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 22to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 23profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 24unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 25or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 26experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and   SB1392 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 2enrollment unit.3    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 4Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 5contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 6refund authorized under this Section.7    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 8if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 9accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 10Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 11Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 12adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 13(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 14102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 151-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 16eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 17102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 181-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 216-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 23103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 241-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff.   SB1392 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b11-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 2    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)3    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 4    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 5the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 6141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 7152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 8155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 9356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 10356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 11356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 12356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 13356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 14356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 15356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 16356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 17356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 18356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 19356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 20356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 21368c, 368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 22403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 23subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 24XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 25Illinois Insurance Code.  SB1392 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 2for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 3Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 4are deemed to be "domestic companies":5        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 6    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;7        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 8    State; or9        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 10    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 11    of this State, except a corporation subject to 12    substantially the same requirements in its state of 13    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 14    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.15    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 16acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 17pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,18        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 19    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 20    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 21    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 22    acquisition of control takes effect;23        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 24    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 25    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 26    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other   SB1392 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 2    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 3    other acquisition of control;4        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 5    following information:6            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 7        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 8        Organization sought to be acquired;9            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 10        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 11        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 12        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 13        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 14        forma financial statements reflecting projected 15        combined operation for a period of 2 years;16            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 17        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 18        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 19        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and20            (D) such other information as the Director shall 21        require.22    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 23Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 24any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 25enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 26maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and   SB1392 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1to its health care certificates).2    (e) In considering any management contract or service 3agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 4Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 5specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 6take into account the effect of the management contract or 7service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 8and the financial condition of the health maintenance 9organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 10into account the effect of the management contract or service 11agreement on competition.12    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 13Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 14Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 15defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 16Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 17group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 18additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:19        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 20    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 21    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 22    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 23    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 24    not be less than one year); and25        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 26    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance   SB1392 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 2    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 3    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 4    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 5    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 6    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 7    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 8    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 9    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 10    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 11    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 12    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 13    plan years.14    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 15statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 16describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 17and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 18the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 19to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 20profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 21unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 22or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 23experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 24the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 25enrollment unit.26    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance   SB1392 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 2contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 3refund authorized under this Section.4    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 5if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 6accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 7Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 8Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 9adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 13eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 151-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 16eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 186-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 20103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 211-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 22eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 241-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 2511-26-24.)   SB1392 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    Section 20. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 2amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)4    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 5health service organizations shall be subject to the 6provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 7141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 8154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 9355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 10356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 11356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 13356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 364.3, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 14403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and Articles 15IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and XXVI of 16the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section shall 17require a limited health care plan to cover any service that is 18not a limited health service. For purposes of the Illinois 19Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles 20XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service organizations in the 21following categories are deemed to be domestic companies:22        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or23        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 24    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 25    of this State, except a corporation subject to   SB1392 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1    substantially the same requirements in its state of 2    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 3    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.4(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 5102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 61-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 7eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 8102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 91-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 10eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 11103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 127-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 13eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 25. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 15amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 16    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)17    Sec. 10. Application of Illinois Insurance Code 18provisions. Health services plan corporations and all persons 19interested therein or dealing therewith shall be subject to 20the provisions of Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 21133, 136, 139, 140, 143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 22354, 355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 23356q, 356r, 356t, 356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 24356z.1, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6,   SB1392 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b1356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 2356z.15, 356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 3356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 4356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 5356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 6356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 364.01, 7364.3, 367.2, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 8408.2, and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of 9the Illinois Insurance Code.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 1810-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 241-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   SB1392 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06099 BAB 16132 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 3changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 4that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 5represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 6not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 7made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 8Public Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 101, 2026.